Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.010

Removing lawful brands.

Every person who shall willfully deface, obliterate, remove, or alter any mark or brand placed by or with the authority of the owner thereof on any shingle bolt, log or stick of timber, or on any horse, mare, gelding, mule, cow, steer, bull, sheep, goat or hog, shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than five years, or by imprisonment in the county jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by both fine and imprisonment.

[ 2011 c 96 s 4; 1992 c 7 s 3; 1909 c 249 s 342; Code 1881 s 839; 1873 p 191 s 54; RRS s 2594.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.

Forest product brands and marks, falsifying, etc.: RCW 76.36.110, 76.36.120.